Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-427
Directors; compensation.

The board of directors shall receive two dollars per day compensation for time actually employed in the business of the district, not exceeding one hundred dollars each per year, but reasonable allowance shall be made for necessary clerical work and assistance.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 21, p. 483;

R.S.1913, § 1891;

C.S.1922, § 1839;

C.S.1929, § 31-527;

R.S.1943, § 31-427.